District of Columbia statutes.
31-5716

Repealed

Exceptions for associations for profit, certain specified organizations.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1316, ch. 854, § 764
Dec. 12, 1928, 45 Stat. 1021, ch. 24
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1216.
1973 Ed., § 35-916.